prince/dictionaries/he-IL.dic
אפה/b
אפו/b
בדה/b
בדו/b
בזו/b
בנה/b
גבו/b
גלה/b
גלו/b
גרו/b
דמה/b
דמו/b
הבעת/b
הודה/b
הודו/b
הונה/b
הונו/b
הורו/b
הכרת/b
הנחת/b
הפחת/b
הרו/b
השבת/b
השחת/b
השתת/b
השתתו/b
השתתי/b
זנה/b
זנו/b
זרו/b
חוסנה/b
חזו/b
חנה/b
חנו/b
חצה/b
חצו/b
יחסו/b
ילדו/b
יעלו/b
יפו/b
ישרו/b
יתרו/b
כפה/b
כפו/b
כרה/b
כרו/b
נגה/b
נסו/b
נעם/b
עטו/b
עלו/b
עשה/b
עשו/b
פנה/b
פנו/b
פרו/b
צבה/b
צבו/b
צוו/b
צווה/b
צלה/b
צלו/b
קנו/b
קשו/b
רבו/b
רזו/b
רעו/b
רפו/b
רצו/b
שרו/b
שתה/b
שתו/b
תלה/b
תלו/b
